Illinois, session 104th, SB3589.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1195 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1195 new)7    Sec. 5-1195. Municipal and county duties.8    (a) By January 1, 2027, every county shall create a 9process by which a resident can report a business, including a 10retail tobacco store, within its territorial limits but 11outside of the territorial limits of any municipality, that 12the resident has reason to believe is committing an offense 13under Section 24.5-10 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 14    (b) By January 1, 2027, every county shall adopt 15regulations to ensure that a business, including a retail 16tobacco store, is not selling nitrous oxide to consumers, with 17the intent to breathe, inhale, or ingest for the purpose of 18causing a condition of intoxication, elation, euphoria, 19dizziness, stupefaction, or dulling of the senses or for the 20purpose of, in any manner, changing, distorting, or disturbing 21the audio, visual, or mental processes. 22    (c) The regulations required by subsection (b) shall 23outline how the county shall regulate a business when the   SB3589- 2 -LRB104 20589 RTM 34079 b1county obtains actual knowledge that a business, including a 2retail tobacco store, committed an offense under Section 324.5-10 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 4    (d) A home rule county or home rule municipality may not 5regulate the retail sale of nitrous oxide in a manner 6inconsistent with this Act. This Section is a denial and 7limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 8(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.  9    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 10adding Section 11-42-18 as follows: 11    (65 ILCS 5/11-42-18 new)12    Sec. 11-42-18. Municipal and county duties.13    (a) By January 1, 2027, every municipality shall create a 14process by which a resident can report a business, including a 15retail tobacco store, within the municipality's territorial 16limits, that the resident has reason to believe is committing 17an offense under Section 24.5-10 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 18    (b) By January 1, 2027, every municipality shall adopt 19regulations to ensure that a business, including a retail 20tobacco store, is not selling nitrous oxide to consumers, with 21the intent to breathe, inhale, or ingest for the purpose of 22causing a condition of intoxication, elation, euphoria, 23dizziness, stupefaction, or dulling of the senses or for the 24purpose of, in any manner, changing, distorting, or disturbing   SB3589- 3 -LRB104 20589 RTM 34079 b1the audio, visual, or mental processes. 2    (c) The regulations required by subsection (b) shall 3outline how the municipality shall regulate a business when 4the municipality obtains actual knowledge that a business, 5including a retail tobacco store, committed an offense under 6Section 24.5-10 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 7    (d) A home rule municipality may not regulate the retail 8sale of nitrous oxide in a manner inconsistent with this 9Section. This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule 10powers and functions under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 11Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.  12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.